District of Columbia statutes.
32-1036

Repealed

Reconsideration and revision of wage orders; ad hoc committees; committee reports of findings and recommendations; failure to report

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1993, D.C. Law 9-248, § 18, 40 DCR 761
1981 Ed., §§ 36-201 to 36-219.